Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2921
Financial assistance; approval; criteria.

The commission shall prioritize the approval of applications for financial assistance based on objective criteria, including, but not limited to:

(1) Economic impact and job creation;

(2) Safety and system resilience benefits;

(3) Readiness and financial feasibility;

(4) Public benefit;

(5) Consistency with statewide transportation goals;

(6) Leverage of private capital or money that is not provided by the State of Nebraska;

(7) Local support of the project; and

(8) The ability for the applicant to repay the financial assistance according to the established terms and conditions.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 21.
July 18, 2026